Arkansas, session 2025, SB132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be
payable from the Individual Income Tax Withholding Fund, for the purpose of
paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) G&C THARALDSON DYNASTY TRUST FBO
BOBBI JO THARALDSON $19,204.34

SECTION 2. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be
payable from the Corporate Income Tax Withholding Fund, for the purpose of
paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

*MAH020*
04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) BIOMAT USA, INC $15,649.00
(02) SOUTHWESTERN BELL TELEPHONE COMPANY 6,024,594.00
(03) SOUTHWESTERN BELL TELEPHONE COMPANY 2,106,556.61
(04) BARCLAYS BANK PLS 447,267.00
(05) COX PORTFOLIO HOLDINGS, INC. 19,917.00
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $8,613,983.61

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Management Services Division, to
be payable from the State Central Services Fund, for the purpose of paying
claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) HEWLETT PACKARD ENTERPRISE COMPANY $71,947.47

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences, to be payable from the
University of Arkansas Medical Center Fund, for the purpose of paying claims
against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) ALYSSA KRISTINE BURNS $20,030.05

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Human Services - Division of Developmental Disabilities
Services, to be payable from the paying account as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for the purpose of paying claims against the
State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) CHRISTINE MCAULIFFE, AS SPECIAL
04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132
ADMINISTRATOR OF THE ESTATE OF DAVID
CAINS $400,000.00

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Human Services, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for the purpose of
paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) UNIVERSITY OF ARKANSAS FOR MEDICAL
SCIENCES $115,639.89

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Veterans Affairs, to be payable from the cash fund deposited in
the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State,
for the purpose of paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee
set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) MARY ANN JONES, AS SPECIAL
ADMINISTRATOR OF THE ESTATE OF OSCAR
ODELL "BILL" JONES, DECEASED, AND ON
BEHALF OF THE WRONGFUL DEATH
BENEFICIARIES OF OSCAR ODELL "BILL" JONES $300,000.00

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Arkansas Department of Transportation, to be payable from the State Highway
and Transportation Department Fund, for the purpose of paying claims against
the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) KENENA PELFREY $343,000.00
(02) MILTON HOLLIMAN 53,035.08
04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132
(03) KATELYN SPICER 95,000.00
(04) STERLING DODSON 900,000.00
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $1,391,035.08

SECTION 9. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Agriculture, to be payable from the paying account as
determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for the purpose of
paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) VERIZON (CELLCO) $17,720.16

SECTION 10. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the Office
of the Treasurer of State, to be payable from the Municipal Aid Fund, for the
purpose of paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out
herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) CITY OF SHERIDAN $20,859.95

SECTION 11. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from the State Central
Services Fund, for the purpose of paying claims against the State of Arkansas
to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) SHI INTERNATIONAL CORP $ 9,907.96

SECTION 12. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from the federal funds as
designated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, for the purpose of
paying claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132
ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) SHI INTERNATIONAL CORP $2,157.44

SECTION 13. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Administrative Office of the Courts, to be payable from the cash fund
deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief Fiscal Officer of
the State, for the purpose of paying claims against the State of Arkansas to
the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) SHI INTERNATIONAL CORP $6,607.16

SECTION 14. APPROPRIATION. There is hereby appropriated, to the
Department of Finance and Administration - Revenue Services Division, to be
payable from the Miscellaneous Revolving Fund, for the purpose of paying
claims against the State of Arkansas to the payee set out herein:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2024-2025
(01) EXCEL FITNESS BEB IV $19,000.00

SECTION 15. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
REIMBURSEMENT AND REFUND TO EXPENDITURE. Funds allocated and expended by any
Agency, Authority, Board, Commission, Council, Department, Division, Office,
or Subdivision of any state agency for the payment of approved claims
adjudicated through the State Claims Commission and approved by the Arkansas
Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee when the General Assembly is in
session, shall be reimbursed from the funds from which the Agency, Authority,
Board, Commission, Council, Department, Division, Office, or Subdivision
draws its support.
The monies shall be deposited no later than June 30 of the following
fiscal year from which the original payment of claim expense was incurred by
the state agency, as a refund to expenditure, to the credit of the fund from
04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132
which the original expenditure was made.

SECTION 16. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CARRYOVER
OF CLAIMS. Any state agency which is affected by the allowed claim(s)
provided for in this Act, and whose fund for the 2023-2024 2024-2025 fiscal
year are insufficient to allow for the payment of said claim(s) before June
30, 2024 2025, is hereby authorized, upon certification by the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State, to make payment of said claim(s) after July 1, 2024
2025, from funds appropriated for the 2024-2025 2025-2026 fiscal year.

SECTION 17. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
DISBURSING OFFICER. The Clerk of the State Claims Commission is hereby made
the disbursing officer for the purpose of paying the claims appropriated by
this Act. The Clerk of the State Claims Commission is hereby authorized to
receive all warrants prepared under the provisions of this Act from the
Auditor of State and to distribute same to the claimants.

SECTION 18. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES CLAIMS. For any claims in this Act appropriated
to the Department of Human Services, the Clerk of the State Claims Commission
shall consult with the Department of Human Services and the Chief Fiscal
Officer of the State to determine the division and funds to which liability
should be assigned and from which the warrants shall be drawn. The Clerk of
the State Claims Commission shall initiate the appropriate transfers as may
be required and as approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

SECTION 19. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. ARKANSAS
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CLAIMS. For any claims in this Act appropriated to the
Department of Health, the Clerk of the State Claims Commission shall consult
with the Department of Health and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State to
determine the division and funds to which liability should be assigned and
from which the warrants shall be drawn. The Clerk of the State Claims
04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132
Commission shall initiate the appropriate transfers as may be required and as
approved by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

SECTION 20. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW. CLAIMS
FROM CASH FUNDS. In the event that any claim authorized herein is determined
to be a valid claim against the State and the claim is to be paid from funds
not in the State Treasury, the Clerk of the State Claims Commission shall
notify the agency against which the claim is to be charged of the amount of
such claims. Upon receipt of such notification, the state agency shall
forth-with deliver a check to the Clerk of the State Claims Commission who
shall deposit the same as a nonrevenue receipt into the Miscellaneous
Revolving Fund from which he shall disburse the amount of the claim to the
claimant.

SECTION 21. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
EMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION CLAIMS. The Clerk of the State Claims Commission
shall not distribute any warrants prepared under the provisions of this Act
for awards made by the Arkansas State Claims Commission for employment
compensation claims. Upon the award by the State Claims Commission of an
employment compensation claim, the Clerk of the State Claims Commission shall
notify the affected state agency and the Department of Finance and
Administration - Office of Personnel Management of such amounts that are due
and payable. The affected state agency shall then process the award through
the State Mechanized Payroll System.

SECTION 22. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.
04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020

As Engrossed: S3/3/25 H4/1/25 SB132

SECTION 23. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 24. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that payees listed in this Act may be entitled to the sums
appropriated and transferred to herein, and that they have been deprived of
the use of these funds for a long period of time, and that further delay in
paying these just debts of the state would do harm to the reputation of the
State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and
this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace,
health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after the date
of its passage and approval.
If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become
effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor
may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides
the veto.

/s/Joint Budget Committee










04-01-2025 16:24:45 MAH020